Utah statutes.
77-6-6.   Answer -- Objections for insufficiency.

The defendant may orally answer the accusation either by admitting or denying it in open court, or he may, in writing, object to the legal sufficiency of the accusation. If the objection to the sufficiency of the accusation is sustained, the accusation shall be dismissed. If the objection is overruled, the defendant shall immediately admit or deny the accusation.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

